Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-716
Payment; duty of county treasurer; expenses; record; duty of county clerk.

When any registered bonds shall mature, the same shall be paid off by the treasurer at the place where the same shall be payable out of any money in his hands or under his control for that purpose, and when so paid the same shall be endorsed by the treasurer on the face thereof Canceled, together with the date of such payment; and thereupon be filed with the clerk, who shall enter satisfaction of such bonds upon the records of such school district. In case such bonds are payable out of the state, an allowance of one-fourth of one percent shall be made to the treasurer for the expense attendant in making such payment, to be deducted from any money in his hands remaining after payment of such matured bonds.

Laws 1879, § 18, p. 175;

R.S.1913, § 463;

C.S.1922, § 380;

C.S.1929, § 11-916;

R.S.1943, § 10-716.